Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,162
Collection system; development; duties.

The Department of Revenue, the Department of Administrative Services, and the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and implement a collection system to carry out the intent of section 77-27,160.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 799;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 705.